Utah statutes.
57-8-8.   Compliance with covenants, bylaws and/or house rules and administrative provisions.

Subject to reasonable compliance therewith by the manager and the management committee, each unit owner shall reasonably comply with the covenants, conditions, and restrictions as set forth in the declaration or in the deed to his unit, and with the bylaws and/or house rules and with the administrative rules and regulations drafted pursuant thereto, as either of the same may be lawfully amended from time to time, and failure to comply shall be ground for an action to recover sums due for damages or injunctive relief or both, maintainable by the manager or management committee on behalf of the unit owners, or in a proper case, by an aggrieved unit owner.



Amended by Chapter 132, 2000 General Session

